src/fst/test/gt-norm2-yamls/V-TA-itêw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Verb - itêw - ok : # VTAi (VTA5 AEW) 

###PRS###
## INDEPENDENT ##
     itêw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1SgO:    kitisin # LOCAL DIR
     itêw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1PlO:    kitisinân
     itêw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+1PlO:    kitisinân
     itêw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+1SgO:    kitisinâwâw

     itêw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+2SgO:    kitititin # LOCAL INVERSE
     itêw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+2SgO:    kitititinân
     itêw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+2PlO:    kitititinân
     itêw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+2PlO:    kitititinâwâw


     itêw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+3SgO:    nititâw # MIXED DIR (obj sg)
     itêw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+3SgO:    kititâw
     itêw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+3SgO:    nititânân
     itêw+V+TA+Ind+12Pl+3SgO:    kititânaw
     itêw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+3SgO:    kititâwâw
     itêw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+3PlO:    nititâwak # MIXED DIR (obj pl)
     itêw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+3PlO:    kititâwak
     itêw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+3PlO:    nititânânak
     itêw+V+TA+Ind+12Pl+3PlO:    kititânawak
     itêw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+3PlO:    kititâwâwak

     itêw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+4Sg/PlO:    nititimâwa # MIXED DIR (obj. obv.)
     itêw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+4Sg/PlO:    kititimâwa
     itêw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+4Sg/PlO:    nititimânâna
     itêw+V+TA+Ind+12Pl+4Sg/PlO:   kititimânawa
     itêw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+4Sg/PlO:    kititimâwâwa

     itêw+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+1SgO:    nititik # MIXED INV (sbj sg)
     itêw+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+2SgO:    kititik
     itêw+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+1PlO:    nititikonân
     itêw+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+12PlO:   kititikonaw
     itêw+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+2PlO:    kititikowâw
     itêw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+1SgO:    [nititikowak, nititikwak] # MIXED INV (sbj pl)
     itêw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+2SgO:    [kititikowak, kititikwak]
     itêw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+1PlO:    nititikonânak
     itêw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+12PlO:   kititikonawak
     itêw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+2PlO:    kititikowâwak

     itêw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+4Sg/PlO:    nititimâwa # MIXED INV (sbj obv.)
     itêw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+4Sg/PlO:    kititimâwa
     itêw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+4Sg/PlO:    nititimânâna
     itêw+V+TA+Ind+12Pl+4Sg/PlO:   kititimânawa
     itêw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+4Sg/PlO:    kititimâwâwa

     itêw+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+4Sg/PlO:    itêw # THIRD DIR
     itêw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+4Sg/PlO:    itêwak
     itêw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO:    itêyiwa
     itêw+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+5Sg/PlO:    itimêw
     itêw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+5Sg/PlO:    itimêwak

     itêw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+3SgO:    [itik, itikow] # THIRD INV
     itêw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+3PlO:    [itikowak, itikwak]
     itêw+V+TA+Ind+5Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO:    itikoyiwa


## CONJUNCT ##
     PV/ê+itêw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+1SgO:    ê-isiyan # LOCAL DIR
     PV/ê+itêw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+1PlO:    ê-isiyâhk
     PV/ê+itêw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+1PlO:    ê-isiyâhk
     PV/ê+itêw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+1SgO:    ê-isiyêk

     PV/ê+itêw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+2SgO:    ê-ititân # LOCAL INVERSE
     PV/ê+itêw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+2SgO:    ê-ititâhk
     PV/ê+itêw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+2PlO:    ê-ititâhk
     PV/ê+itêw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+2PlO:    ê-ititakok


     PV/ê+itêw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+3SgO:    ê-itak # MIXED DIR (obj sg)
     PV/ê+itêw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+3SgO:    ê-itat
     PV/ê+itêw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+3SgO:    ê-itâyâhk
     PV/ê+itêw+V+TA+Cnj+12Pl+3SgO:   ê-itâyahk
     PV/ê+itêw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+3SgO:    ê-itâyêk
     PV/ê+itêw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+3PlO:    ê-itakik # MIXED DIR (obj pl)
     PV/ê+itêw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+3PlO:    ê-itacik
     PV/ê+itêw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+3PlO:    ê-itâyâhkik
     PV/ê+itêw+V+TA+Cnj+12Pl+3PlO:   ê-itâyahkok
     PV/ê+itêw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+3PlO:    ê-itâyêkok

     PV/ê+itêw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+4Sg/PlO:    ê-itimak # MIXED DIR (obj. obv.)
     PV/ê+itêw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+4Sg/PlO:    ê-itimat
     PV/ê+itêw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+4Sg/PlO:    ê-itimâyâhk
     PV/ê+itêw+V+TA+Cnj+12Pl+4Sg/PlO:   ê-itimâyahk
     PV/ê+itêw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+4Sg/PlO:    ê-itimâyêk

     PV/ê+itêw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+1SgO:    ê-isit # MIXED INV (sbj sg)
     PV/ê+itêw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+2SgO:    ê-itisk
     PV/ê+itêw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+1PlO:    ê-itikoyâhk
     PV/ê+itêw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+12PlO:   ê-itikoyahk
     PV/ê+itêw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+2PlO:    ê-itikoyêk
     PV/ê+itêw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+1SgO:    ê-isicik # MIXED INV (sbj pl)
     PV/ê+itêw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+2SgO:    ê-itiskik
     PV/ê+itêw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+1PlO:    ê-itikoyâhkik
     PV/ê+itêw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+12PlO:   ê-itikoyahkok
     PV/ê+itêw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+2PlO:    ê-itikoyêkok

     PV/ê+itêw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+1SgO:    ê-itimit # MIXED INV (sbj obv.)
     PV/ê+itêw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+2SgO:    ê-itimisk
     PV/ê+itêw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+1PlO:    ê-itikoyâhk
     PV/ê+itêw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+12PlO:   ê-itikoyahk
     PV/ê+itêw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+2PlO:    ê-itikoyêk

     PV/ê+itêw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+4Sg/PlO:    ê-itât # THIRD DIR
     PV/ê+itêw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+4Sg/PlO:    ê-itâcik
     PV/ê+itêw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO: ê-itâyit
     PV/ê+itêw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+5Sg/PlO:    ê-itimât
     PV/ê+itêw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+5Sg/PlO:    ê-itimâcik

     PV/ê+itêw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+3SgO:    ê-itikot # THIRD INV
     PV/ê+itêw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+3PlO:    ê-itikocik
     PV/ê+itêw+V+TA+Cnj+5Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO: ê-itikoyit

## FUTURE CONDITIONAL ##
     itêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Sg+1SgO:    isiyani # LOCAL DIR
     itêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Sg+1PlO:    isiyâhki
     itêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Pl+1PlO:    isiyâhki
     itêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Pl+1SgO:    isiyêko

     itêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Sg+2SgO:    ititâni # LOCAL INVERSE
     itêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Pl+2SgO:    ititâhki
     itêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Pl+2PlO:    ititâhki
     itêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Sg+2PlO:    ititako


     itêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Sg+3SgO:    itaki # MIXED DIR (obj sg)
     itêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Sg+3SgO:    itaci
     itêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Pl+3SgO:    itâyâhki
     itêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+12Pl+3SgO:   [itâyahko, itâyahki]
     itêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Pl+3SgO:    itâyêko
     itêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Sg+3PlO:    itakwâwi # MIXED DIR (obj pl)
     itêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Sg+3PlO:    itatwâwi
     itêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Pl+3PlO:    itâyâhkwâwi
     itêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+12Pl+3PlO:   itâyahkwâwi
     itêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Pl+3PlO:    itâyêkwâwi

     itêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Sg+4Sg/PlO:    itimaki # MIXED DIR (obj. obv.)
     itêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Sg+4Sg/PlO:    itimaci
     itêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Pl+4Sg/PlO:    itimâyâhki
     itêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+12Pl+4Sg/PlO:   [itimâyahko, itimâyahki]
     itêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Pl+4Sg/PlO:    itimâyêko

     itêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Sg+1SgO:    isici # MIXED INV (sbj sg)
     itêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Sg+2SgO:    itiski
     itêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Sg+1PlO:    itikoyâhki
     itêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Sg+12PlO:   [itikoyahko, itikoyahki]
     itêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Sg+2PlO:    itikoyêko
     itêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Pl+1SgO:    isitwâwi # MIXED INV (sbj pl)
     itêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Pl+2SgO:    itiskwâwi
     itêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Pl+1PlO:    itikoyâhkwâwi
     itêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Pl+12PlO:   itikoyahkwâwi
     itêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Pl+2PlO:    itikoyêkwâwi

     itêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl+1SgO:    itimici # MIXED INV (sbj obv.)
     itêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl+2SgO:    itimiski
     itêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl+1PlO:    itikoyâhki
     itêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl+12PlO:   [itikoyahko, itikoyahki]
     itêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl+2PlO:    itikoyêko

     itêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Sg+4Sg/PlO:    itâci # THIRD DIR
     itêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Pl+4Sg/PlO:    itâtwâwi
     itêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO: itâyici
     itêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Sg+5Sg/PlO:    itimâci
     itêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Pl+5Sg/PlO:    itimâtwâwi

     itêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl+3SgO:    itikoci # THIRD INV
     itêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl+3PlO:    itikotwâwi
     itêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+5Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO: itikoyici

## IMPERATIVE ##
#LOCAL IMMEDIATE#
     itêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Sg+1SgO:    isin
     itêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Sg+1PlO:    isinân
     itêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Pl+1PlO:    isinân
     itêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Pl+1SgO:    isik
#LOCAL DELAYED#
     itêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Sg+1SgO:    isîhkan
     itêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Sg+1PlO:    isîhkâhk
     itêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Pl+1PlO:    isîhkâhk
     itêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Pl+1SgO:    isîhkêk

#MIXED IMMEDIATE#
     itêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Sg+3SgO:    isi # Obj. Sg.
     itêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Pl+3SgO:    itihk
     itêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+12Pl+3SgO:    itâtân

     itêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Sg+3PlO:    isik # Obj. Pl.
     itêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Pl+3PlO:    itihkok
     itêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+12Pl+3PlO:    itâtânik
#MIXED DELAYED#
     itêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Sg+3SgO:    itâhkan # Obj. Sg.
     itêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Pl+3SgO:    itâhkêk
     itêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+12Pl+3SgO:    itâhkahk

     itêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Sg+3PlO:    itâhkanik # Obj. Pl.
     itêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Pl+3PlO:    itâhkêkok
     itêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+12Pl+3PlO:    itâhkahkok


###PRT###

## INDEPENDENT ##
     PV/kî+itêw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1SgO:    kikî-isin # LOCAL DIR
     PV/kî+itêw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1PlO:    kikî-isinân
     PV/kî+itêw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+1PlO:    kikî-isinân
     PV/kî+itêw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+1SgO:    kikî-isinâwâw

     PV/kî+itêw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+2SgO:    kikî-ititin # LOCAL INVERSE
     PV/kî+itêw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+2SgO:    kikî-ititinân
     PV/kî+itêw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+2PlO:    kikî-ititinân
     PV/kî+itêw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+2PlO:    kikî-ititinâwâw

## CONJUNCT ##
     PV/ê+PV/kî+itêw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+1SgO:    ê-kî-isiyan # LOCAL DIR
     PV/ê+PV/kî+itêw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+1PlO:    ê-kî-isiyâhk
     PV/ê+PV/kî+itêw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+1PlO:    ê-kî-isiyâhk
     PV/ê+PV/kî+itêw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+1SgO:    ê-kî-isiyêk

     PV/ê+PV/kî+itêw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+2SgO:    ê-kî-ititân # LOCAL INVERSE
     PV/ê+PV/kî+itêw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+2SgO:    ê-kî-ititâhk
     PV/ê+PV/kî+itêw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+2PlO:    ê-kî-ititâhk
     PV/ê+PV/kî+itêw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+2PlO:    ê-kî-ititakok


###FUT+INT###

## INDEPENDENT ##
     PV/wî+itêw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1SgO:    kiwî-isin # LOCAL DIR
     PV/wî+itêw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1PlO:    kiwî-isinân
     PV/wî+itêw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+1PlO:    kiwî-isinân
     PV/wî+itêw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+1SgO:    kiwî-isinâwâw

     PV/wî+itêw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+2SgO:    kiwî-ititin # LOCAL INVERSE
     PV/wî+itêw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+2SgO:    kiwî-ititinân
     PV/wî+itêw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+2PlO:    kiwî-ititinân
     PV/wî+itêw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+2PlO:    kiwî-ititinâwâw

## CONJUNCT ##
     PV/ê+PV/wî+itêw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+1SgO:    ê-wî-isiyan # LOCAL DIR
     PV/ê+PV/wî+itêw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+1PlO:    ê-wî-isiyâhk
     PV/ê+PV/wî+itêw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+1PlO:    ê-wî-isiyâhk
     PV/ê+PV/wî+itêw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+1SgO:    ê-wî-isiyêk

     PV/ê+PV/wî+itêw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+2SgO:    ê-wî-ititân # LOCAL INVERSE
     PV/ê+PV/wî+itêw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+2SgO:    ê-wî-ititâhk
     PV/ê+PV/wî+itêw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+2PlO:    ê-wî-ititâhk
     PV/ê+PV/wî+itêw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+2PlO:    ê-wî-ititakok


###FUT+DEF###

## INDEPENDENT ##
     PV/ka+itêw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1SgO:    kika-isin # LOCAL DIR
     PV/ka+itêw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1PlO:    kika-isinân
     PV/ka+itêw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+1PlO:    kika-isinân
     PV/ka+itêw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+1SgO:    kika-isinâwâw

     PV/ka+itêw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+2SgO:    kika-ititin # LOCAL INVERSE
     PV/ka+itêw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+2SgO:    kika-ititinân
     PV/ka+itêw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+2PlO:    kika-ititinân
     PV/ka+itêw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+2PlO:    kika-ititinâwâw
